Illinois, session 104th, HB2052.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firefighter Training Leave of Absence Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 323/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Firefighter Training Leave of Absence Act.9(Source: P.A. 103-220, eff. 1-1-24.)